Utah statutes.
31A-37-503.   Classification and use of records.

(1)  The following shall be classified as a protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act:

(a)  examination reports under this section;

(b)  preliminary examination reports or results under this section;

(c)  working papers for an examination conducted under this section;

(d)  recorded information for an examination conducted under this section; and

(e)  documents and copies of documents produced by, obtained by, or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in the course of an examination conducted under this section.

(2)  This section does not prevent the commissioner from using the information provided under this section in furtherance of the commissioner's regulatory authority under this title.

(3)  Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the commissioner may grant access to the information provided under this section to:

(a)  public officers having jurisdiction over the regulation of insurance in any other state or country; or

(b)  law enforcement officers of this state or any other state or agency of the federal government, if the officers receiving the information agree in writing to hold the information in a manner consistent with this section.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

